California statutes. Education Code
The board shall prescribe in the detail that it deems necessary, the purposes for which moneys apportioned by it or which it requires the district to contribute toward, or in reduction of the cost of a project, may be expended, and the prescription shall be binding upon the governing board of the district, save as it may be changed or modified by the board for any cause that it sees fit. In determining funds which can be contributed by the district, the board may require the district to contribute unexpended balances of funds earmarked or encumbered by the district
 for furniture, equipment, or any other lawful purpose. However, the changes or substitutions in the purposes for which the funds were earmarked or encumbered, with respect to the requirement under any apportionment heretofore or hereafter made, may be authorized by the board, or pursuant to its delegation, by the Director of General Services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16092.

Unless the board has received the certificates of the county superintendent of schools required by Section 16061 within nine months from the date of the conditional apportionment, it shall, at the expiration of the nine months’ period, void the conditional apportionment and shall certify this fact to the Controller. Each final apportionment made by the board under this chapter shall be certified by it to the Controller who shall from time to time draw his or her warrant on the Treasurer in favor of the county treasurer of the county having jurisdiction over the
 district in accordance with the terms of the final apportionment. The warrant shall be exempt from the provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 16100) of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall be paid by the Treasurer from the State School Building Aid Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16093.

A state school building fund is hereby created in the county treasury in each county for each school district in the county. The county treasurer of each county shall pay into the state school building fund of each school district, exactly as apportioned by the board, all moneys received by him or her under this chapter with respect to each school district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16094.

Interest earned on those portions of deposits in a state school building fund representing allocations from the proceeds of state school construction bonds received by the county treasurer for the benefit of a school district under this chapter shall be paid into the state school building fund created by Section 16093. The interest which prior to the 1964–65 fiscal year was deposited in the general fund of the school district for which the state school building fund was established shall remain the property of that general fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16095.

The governing board of each school district to which an apportionment is made under this chapter is authorized to, and shall, transfer to the state school building fund of the district from all other funds of the district in which the moneys may be, all moneys of the district which under, or pursuant to, this chapter are required to be expended for the project for which the apportionment was made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16096.

A fund in the State Treasury is hereby created, to be known as the State School Building Aid Fund. All money in the State School Building Aid Fund, including any money deposited in the fund from any source whatsoever after November 12, 1952, is hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for expenditure pursuant to apportionments made under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16096.5.

From any moneys in the State School Building Aid Fund available for the purposes of this chapter, the board shall make available to the Director of General Services any amounts that it determines necessary to provide the assistance, pursuant to this chapter, required by Section 15504 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16097.

The governing board of each school district to which an apportionment has been made under this chapter shall expend the moneys in the state school building fund of the school district exactly as apportioned by the board and only for the purposes for which the moneys were apportioned to the district, and for no other purpose, and shall make the reports relating to the expenditure of the moneys that the board and the Controller shall require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16099.

It shall be the duty of the Controller to make the audit or audits of the books and records of counties and school districts receiving apportionments under this chapter, as he or she may deem necessary from time to time, for the purpose of determining that the money received by school districts as apportionments hereunder has been expended for the purposes and under the conditions authorized by this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16100.

Whenever the Controller determines that any money apportioned to a school district has been expended by the school district for purposes not authorized by this chapter, or exceeds the final cost of the project which is authorized by Section 16024 to be paid therefrom, the Controller shall furnish written notice to the board, the governing board of the school district, the county superintendent of schools, the county auditor, and the county treasurer of the county whose county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the school district, directing the school
 district and the county treasurer to pay into the State Treasury the amount of the unauthorized expenditures, or the amount of the excess apportionment, as the case may be. Upon receipt of the notice, the governing board shall order the county treasurer to pay to the Treasurer, out of any moneys in the county treasury available to the school district for that purpose, the amount set forth in the notice. The amount shall, upon order of the Controller, be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State School Building Aid Fund, to be reapportioned by the board.

It shall be the duty of the governing body and the county treasurer to make the payments to the Treasurer as provided in this section, and it shall be the duty of the Controller to enforce the collection on behalf of the state.

If, upon petition of the district, the Controller determines that the amount to be included in the county settlement is in excess of
 the amount that may be paid out of taxes levied at the maximum rate authorized by law (increased by any increase in the rate authorized by the electors of the district pursuant to Section 42202), without impairing essential district services, he or she may provide for the payment of the entire amount or any unpaid balance thereof in not exceeding three consecutive annual payments, commencing with the next school year. Each payment shall be an equal portion of the principal amount, plus accrued interest, and shall be paid not later than January 31st of each school year in which a payment is due. If the district fails to make the payment as specified, the Controller shall deduct the amount thereof from the February payment made to the district under Section 14041.

Deferred payments under this section shall bear interest at the same annual rate of interest as the apportionment from which the unauthorized expenditures or the amounts of excess apportionment were
 made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16101.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if an apportionment is or has been made at any time after October 1, 1953, to meet a construction low bid and if the State Allocation Board after approving the apportionment revises the apportionment, and the apportionment finally approved reveals that an applicant school district receives excess construction area to what they are entitled to pursuant to Section 16044, and if a judgment for the collection of the excess apportionment has not been rendered by a court prior to September 11, 1957, the excess
 apportionment shall be computed by the Controller and shall be repaid pursuant to this section. The district shall repay the amount of excess apportionment, and the interest thereon, in equal annual installments within 20 years from the date it receives the excess apportionment. The rate of interest shall be the same rate as that fixed for the approved apportionment. The district may at any time before the end of the 20-year period for repayment elect to repay, and repay, the balance of the excess apportionment then unpaid, plus interest computed to the date of repayment of such balance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16102.

If the board, between April 5, 1963, and July 1, 1963, approves an application for an apportionment and makes a conditional apportionment to the district making the application and if after the approval it is determined that the projected enrollment of the district is less than that upon which the district’s application was based, any apportionment made by the board under the application is hereby ratified and confirmed and payments shall be made to the district pursuant to the apportionment. The board shall as a condition to any apportionment made under the
 application require the district to repay in full that portion of the apportionment which it determines to be attributable to the excess projected enrollment upon which the application was based and the district shall be empowered and obligated to comply with the requirement if it accepts the portion of the apportionment. The repayment shall be in equal annual installments made within 20 years from the date the district receives the apportionment. The repayment shall be in addition to any other repayment required by this chapter. The rate of interest shall be the same rate as that fixed for the remainder of the apportionment.

If at any time the board determines that the amount of actual enrollment of the district attains the amount of the projected enrollment upon which the district’s application, referred to above, was based, the board may, if it determines that the inclusion of the excess projected enrollment in the application occurred inadvertently, provide that
 the district shall not be required to pay any further installments for full repayment of that portion of the apportionment attributable to the excess projected enrollment and the unpaid balance of the portion and interest thereon shall thereafter be repaid under the same terms and in the same manner as the balance of the apportionment made under the application.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16103.

If a school district entered into an agreement at any time beginning on October 1, 1954, and ending on December 31, 1954, whereby it agreed to lease a site and facilities situated thereon, for the purpose of constructing administrative facilities on the site in accordance with plans prepared by or for the district, the State Allocation Board may make an apportionment to the district for the acquisition of the site and facilities; provided, (1) that the district at the time of receiving the apportionment would otherwise be eligible to receive an apportionment for
 square footage of building area equal to or exceeding that of the facilities to be constructed; (2) the Department of Education approves of the acquisition on the basis that it is necessary to provide needed administrative facilities for the district; and (3) the board finds that the acquisition and the consideration being paid therefor is economically feasible and constitutes sound financial practice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16104.

Any portion of an apportionment paid to a school district under this chapter shall be available for expenditure by its governing board for not less than one year nor more than three years, as the board shall determine, after the date on which the warrant covering that portion of the apportionment was issued by the Controller, provided that no limitation on expenditure shall be applicable with respect to any items the payment or reimbursement of which is required to be made by special resolution pursuant to Section 16057, whether the special resolution is adopted
 prior or subsequent to the termination of the period of availability herein specified. For the purposes of this chapter, an apportionment shall be deemed to be expended at the time and to the extent that the amount thereof on deposit in the county treasury has been encumbered by the creation of a valid obligation on the part of the school district. Upon the expiration of its period of availability, the unencumbered balance of any apportionment made under this chapter shall become due and payable to the State of California; and the governing board of the school district and the county treasurer shall pay the amount of the unencumbered balance to the Treasurer, out of the funds, and in the manner specified in Section 16100 of this code. The payment shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the State School Building Aid Fund in the State Treasury, to be reapportioned by the board.

It shall be the duty of the governing body and county treasurer to make the
 payments to the Treasurer as provided in this section, and it shall be the duty of the Controller to enforce the collection on behalf of the state, provided that notwithstanding the above duties shall not be deemed to exist with respect to any amount heretofore or hereafter due the state occasioned by the termination of the period of availability of expenditure provided by this section where the period of availability of expenditure for the items representing the amount is subsequently made inapplicable by the adoption of a special resolution pursuant to Section 16057.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16105.

Whenever a school district receives or has received an apportionment for or toward the purchase or improvement of realty or personalty (hereafter referred to as “property”) and within five years from the date of the written authorization from a duly authorized representative of the board for the expenditure therefor from state funds or from contributable district funds, sells, leases, exchanges or otherwise disposes of the property or any portion thereof without the consent of the board, the board may demand the return of the state apportionment or the portion
 thereof it deems proper, plus accrued interest at the prescribed rate, less any repayment made prior to the demand by the district on account of the apportionment. A district may not at any time while an apportionment remains unpaid or noncanceled, dispose of any property acquired therefrom without the consent of the board, excepting transfers provided for by Article 15 (commencing with Section 17556) of Chapter 3 of Part 23 and existing improvements on an acquired site. The consent may be subject to the conditions as may be imposed, which may include the application of the consideration received in reduction of any apportionments previously made to the district. Any property into which the consideration from the disposition is converted shall be and remain the property of the state as if an apportionment had originally been authorized therefor.

Whenever, in the judgment of the board, a district fails to use property for the purpose or purposes for which an
 apportionment has been made, within not less than one nor more than five years from the aforesaid authorization, as the board shall determine, the board may demand back the return of the apportionment, or portion thereof, with interest, as specified in the preceding paragraph. The board’s interpretation of the “use” in any instance, and whether or not the district has complied therewith, shall be conclusive upon the district affected after a hearing and finding of the board. In addition to the foregoing, the board may at any time subsequent to the expiration of the last mentioned period, while an apportionment remains unpaid or uncanceled, determine that a site or portion thereof, purchased in whole or in part with the apportionment is not being used for the purpose or purposes for which the apportionment was made, which determination shall be conclusive upon the district after a hearing and finding of the board. Pursuant to that determination, the board may direct the sale or other disposition of the site
 or portion thereof by the state or by the district and apply the proceeds, after deducting expenses it determines necessary to facilitate the disposition, in reduction of the apportionment, plus accrued interest. Any excess shall be applied in reduction of any other unpaid or noncanceled apportionments, plus interest, as the board shall direct, any remaining proceeds thereafter being payable to the district. For the purposes of the determination of disposition, the district shall, whenever directed by the board, convey record title to the site or portion thereof to the state or do any other acts deemed necessary by the board to facilitate the disposition or implement the terms thereof. Any disposition authorized to be made hereunder by the district shall be made in accordance with the procedure prescribed by this code for the disposition of unneeded school property, otherwise as directed by the board, provided that the consideration to be received shall be subject to the approval of the board or its delegate
 for that purpose.

Written notice of any demand prescribed by this section, setting forth the amount due the state pursuant thereto, shall be furnished by the board to the governing board of the school district, the county superintendent of schools, the county auditor, the county treasurer of the county whose county has jurisdiction over the school district, and the Controller. Upon receipt of the notice and demand, the governing board of the school district shall order the county treasurer to pay to the Treasurer, out of any moneys in the county treasury available to the school district for that purpose, the amount set forth in the notice. The amount shall, upon order of the Controller, be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State School Building Aid Fund, to be reapportioned by the board.

Whenever a school district receives or has received an apportionment under this chapter for the purchase of a site
 which contains existing improvements, the board may require the district to dispose of the existing improvements as a condition of receiving an apportionment in the manner as the board deems proper, and contribute the net proceeds therefrom or the value of any consideration received therefor, in reduction of any apportionment. In the event that the district is not so required to dispose of the existing improvements but after receiving the apportionment subsequently disposes thereof, the net proceeds therefrom or the value of the consideration received therefor, shall be contributed by the district in reduction of any remaining indebtedness to the state under this chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700).

Where a district has been unable to use any building site acquired by an apportionment under this chapter because of the delay of the board in acting upon its application for an apportionment for the planning and construction of school buildings on the
 site, the board may withhold demand for repayment of the apportionment for the building site for a period of not less than one or more than three years after approval of the apportionment for planning and construction.

It shall be the duty of the governing body and county treasurer to make the payments to the Treasurer as provided in this section, and it shall be the duty of the Controller to enforce the collection on behalf of the state.

Whenever the consent of the board is required in this section, it may be given by written authorization of its authorized representative for that purpose. The provisions of this section, including the term “apportionment” or “apportionments,” shall be deemed to be applicable to apportionments heretofore or hereafter made under this chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. School Housing Aid for Reorganized Districts [16150. - 16166.]

16150.

(a) As used in this article:

(1) “Acquiring district” means a district in which all or a part of a state-aided district or an applicant district has been included.

(2) “Original district” means a state-aided or applicant district included in whole or in part in an acquiring district.

(3) “State-aided district” means a district to which a conditional or final apportionment has been made under this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this article as it applies to an acquiring district, the effective
 date of any change of boundaries, annexation, formation of a new district, or other reorganization shall be:

(1) For granting conditional apportionments: the date the action became effective for purposes of Sections 35532 and 35533.

(2) For making conditional apportionments final: the date the action became effective for purposes of Sections 35532 and 35533.

(c) For purposes of this article as it applies to an original district, the effective date of any change of boundaries, annexation, formation of a new district, or other reorganization in which the original district is included in whole or in part in an acquiring district shall be:

(1) For granting conditional apportionments: the date the action becomes effective for all purposes as specified in
 Section 35534.

(2) For making conditional apportionments final: the date the action became effective for all purposes as specified in Section 35534.

(3) No conditional apportionment may be made to any original district affected by any reorganization after the date that action became effective for purposes of Sections 35532 and 35533 except upon an application that has the approval of the governing board of the acquiring district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 4.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16151.

On the date an acquiring district becomes effective for all purposes, as specified in Section 35534, the authority to accept a state loan voted by an original district pursuant to this chapter whose boundaries are coterminous with the boundaries of the acquiring district shall become authority of the acquiring district to accept a state loan. However, when the proceeds of bonds authorized and sold by the acquiring district are applied toward the reduction of apportionments made to an original district that is included in whole in the acquiring district pursuant to Section 16058, the amount of bond proceeds shall be excluded in determining the amount chargeable against any apportionment authorized to be accepted by the electorate of the original or acquiring
 district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 5.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16152.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, where an election is or has been held after April 1, 1972, in two elementary districts for the purpose of forming a new elementary district from the territories of the districts, which reorganization would become effective for all purposes on July 1, 1973, and where one of the districts has prior to April 1, 1972, voted to accept, expend, and repay apportionments under this chapter but no apportionments pursuant to the authorization has been made to the district as of April 1, 1972, the consent of the electors in the districts to the reorganization shall be deemed to constitute a consent on behalf of the newly formed district to accept, expend, and repay apportionments under this chapter to the extent that the former authorization for apportionments had not been utilized.

Further, the ballot for the election held for the purpose of forming the new elementary school district shall contain a statement to the effect that approval of reorganization shall be deemed to constitute a consent on behalf of the newly formed district to accept, expend, and repay apportionments under this chapter to the extent that the former authorization for apportionments has not been utilized.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16153.

Whenever, prior to the date on which a conditional apportionment is made by the board to an applicant district, (1) if an applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole in another district which is ineligible for an apportionment under this chapter, no apportionment shall be made to the applicant district; (2) if less than the whole of an applicant district is included in a district which is ineligible for an apportionment under this chapter, the board may reconsider the application of the applicant district and make such determinations and take the action with respect thereto, including the making, subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter, of a conditional apportionment to the district, as the board may deem necessary because of such inclusion of less than the whole of the applicant district in the acquiring district; (3) if an applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole or in part in a district which is eligible for an apportionment under this chapter and has made or does make an application for the apportionment, the board may reconsider the applications of the applicant district and the acquiring district and make the determinations and take the action with respect thereto, including the making, subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter, of conditional apportionments to the districts, as the board may deem necessary because of the annexation or other inclusion in the acquiring district of the applicant district in whole or in part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16154.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment is made by the board to an applicant district, but prior to the date on which the conditional apportionment becomes final, (1) if an applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole in a district which is not eligible for an apportionment under this chapter, the conditional apportionment shall, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, become void and the board shall promptly notify the Controller in writing thereof and the date on which the apportionment became void; (2) if the district to which an applicant district is annexed or in which it is otherwise included in whole is eligible for an apportionment, has made or does make an application for such an apportionment under this chapter, the conditional apportionment made to the applicant district shall, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, become void but the board may reconsider the application of the acquiring district and make the determinations and take such action with respect thereto, including the making, subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter except as hereinafter provided, of additional conditional apportionments to the acquiring district, as the board may deem necessary as a result of such annexation or other inclusion in the acquiring district of the applicant district; (3) if less than the whole of an applicant district is included in another district, the conditional apportionment shall, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, become void, but the board may reconsider the application and make such determinations and take such actions with respect thereto, including the making, subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter except as hereinafter provided, of new conditional apportionments to the applicant district, as the board may deem necessary as a result of such inclusion of a portion of the applicant district in the acquiring district.

Notwithstanding anything in the first sentence of Section 16058 to the contrary, additional conditional apportionments made to a district under (2), or new conditional apportionments made to a district under (3) of the first paragraph of this section may, with the approval of the board, become final if the total amount of the bonds of the district outstanding and unpaid is within twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the amount required under Section 16058.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16155.

If an annexation or other inclusion of a portion of an applicant district in another district comprises less than 5 percent of the assessed valuation of the applicant district on the effective date of the change, no annexation or other inclusion shall be deemed to have taken place for the purposes of Sections 16154 and 16156.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16156.

Whenever, prior to the date on which conditional apportionments have been made to an applicant district for the full amount of state aid approved for the district under Section 16035, (1) if the applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole in another district which is ineligible for an apportionment under this chapter, no further apportionment shall be made to the applicant district; (2) if the applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole in a district which is eligible for an apportionment under this chapter and which has made or does make an application for the apportionment, the board may reconsider the applications of the applicant district and the acquiring district and make any determinations and take any action with respect thereto, including the making, subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter, of a conditional apportionment or apportionments to the acquiring district that the board may deem necessary because of the annexation or other inclusion in the acquiring district of the applicant district; (3) if a portion of the applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in another district, the board may reconsider the application of the applicant district and may, within two years after the first apportionment made under the approval, make the additional apportionments as it sees fit to the applicant district, but not in excess of the amount in which the application was originally approved, without requiring the district to issue additional bonds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16157.

If, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment made to a district becomes final, the state-aided district is included in whole in another district, the acquiring district shall, on the effective date of the inclusion, succeed to and be vested with all of the duties, powers, purposes, jurisdiction, and responsibilities of the state-aided district with respect to the apportionment and the property acquired or to be acquired from funds provided thereby, and all funds in the state school building fund of the state-aided district shall be transferred to the state school building fund of the acquiring district. All amounts that would, after the effective date of the inclusion, have been otherwise paid to the state-aided district under the terms of or
 pursuant to the apportionment, shall be paid to the acquiring district. In addition, the acquiring district shall, on the effective date of the inclusion of the state-aided district in the acquiring district as fixed by Section 35534, become liable for the annual repayments and other payments due the state under Section 16075 and other provisions of this chapter with respect to the apportionment or the property acquired or to be acquired therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 6.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16158.

Whenever one or more state-aided districts are included in whole in an acquiring district, and the acquiring district applies for and receives an apportionment, then after the effective date of the inclusion and upon the approval of the application of the acquiring district, the governing board of each component state-aided district shall immediately transfer to the acquiring district all moneys of the component district which are required to be, or have been, earmarked for a project or projects of the district. The acquiring district, upon the transfer to it of the funds, may expend the funds for any projects of the acquiring district as to which its application was approved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16159.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment made to a state-aided district becomes final, less than all of the district is included in another district, the Director of General Services shall determine what portion of the apportionment was expended or will be expended for property acquired or to be acquired by the acquiring district. Any determination made by the Director of General Services under this section may be redetermined by him or her, from time to time, until the project for which the apportionment was made has been completed, and the final cost thereof determined and the final determination has been made pursuant to the final cost. The Director of General Services shall promptly notify the Controller, the governing board of the state-aided district and of the acquiring district, the superintendent of schools, the auditor and the treasurer of the counties having jurisdiction over the districts of each determination and redetermination made by him or her under this section. No redetermination shall be retroactive nor affect the liability of any school district for any payment or annual repayment, or portion thereof, previously made by or on behalf of the district to the state under this chapter.

On and after the date of the change of boundaries, the acquiring district succeeds to and is vested with all of the duties, powers, purposes, jurisdiction, and responsibilities of the state-aided district with respect to that portion of the apportionment which the Director of General Services has determined or redetermined under this section was expended, or will be expended, for property acquired or to be acquired by the acquiring district, and the unexpended part of the portion of the apportionment in the state school building fund of the state-aided district shall be transferred to the state school building fund of the acquiring district. In addition, and at the same time, the acquiring district shall become liable for the payment to the state of that portion of the annual repayment and all other payments due the state under Section 16075 and other provisions of this chapter with respect to that portion of the apportionment which the Director of General Services has determined or redetermined was expended, or will be expended for property acquired, or to be acquired by the acquiring district, or, in the event the portion of the apportionment is a lower percentage of the apportionment than the percentage that the assessed valuation in the territory of the state-aided district which was transferred to the acquiring district is of the total assessed valuation of the state-aided district immediately preceding the effective date of the transfer, the acquiring district shall become liable for the payment to the state of that portion of the annual repayment and all other repayments due the state under Section 16075 and other provisions of this chapter with respect to the apportionment which is equal to the percentage of assessed valuation in the territory transferred to the acquiring district. “Annual repayment,” as used in this section, refers to repayment computed under Sections 16070 to 16075, inclusive, and excludes amounts for which the state-aided district is liable under the provisions of Section 16039. Whenever a site for which repayments are being made under Section 16039 is transferred to an acquiring district the acquiring district shall be liable for the repayments required under Section 16039.
